pt-PT: Agente levedante: Fermento em pó; Bicarbonato de sódio; Farinha com fermento; Massa mãe; Sem fermento; Levedura; Outro
pl: Środek spulchniający: Proszek do pieczenia; Soda oczyszczona; Mąka samorosnąca; Zakwas; Bez spulchniaczy; Drożdże; Inne
zh-CN: 膨松剂: 泡打粉; 小苏打; 自发粉; 酸面团发酵种; 未发酵; 酵母; 其他
sl-SI: Sredstvo za vzhajanje: Pecilni prašek; Soda bikarbona; Moka z dodanim pecilnim praškom; Droži; Nekvašeno; Kvas; Drugo
fr: Agent levant: Levure chimique; Bicarbonate de soude; Farine à levure incorporée; Levain naturel; Sans levain; Levure; Autre
hu: Kelesztőanyag: Sütőpor; Szódabikarbóna; Sütőporos liszt; Kovász; Kovásztalan; Élesztő; Egyéb
es: Agente leudante: Polvo para hornear; Bicarbonato de sodio; Harina leudante; Masa madre; Sin levadura; Levadura; Otro
sk-SK: Kypiaca látka: Kypriaci prášok; Sóda bikarbóna; Samokypriaca múka; Kvások; Bez kypriacich látok; Droždie; Iné
ru: Разрыхляющий агент: Разрыхлитель; Пищевая сода; Самоподнимающаяся мука; Закваска; Пресное; Дрожжи; Другое
fi: Kohotusaine: Leivinjauhe; Ruokasooda; Itsekohottava jauho; Hapanjuuri; Kohottamaton; Hiiva; Muu
da: Hævemiddel: Bagepulver; Natron; Selvhævende mel; Surdej; Usyret; Gær; Andet
nl: Rijsmiddel: Bakpoeder; Zuiveringszout; Zelfrijzend bakmeel; Zuurdesemstarter; Ongerezen; Gist; Overig
tr: Mayalama maddesi: Kabartma tozu; Karbonat; Kendinden kabaran un; Ekşi maya; Mayasız; Maya; Diğer
cs: Kypřicí látka: Kypřicí prášek do pečiva; Jedlá soda; Samokypřicí mouka; Kvásek; Nekynuté; Droždí; Jiné
pt-BR: Agente de fermentação: Fermento em pó; Bicarbonato de sódio; Farinha com fermento; Fermento natural (sourdough); Sem fermento; Fermento biológico; Outro
nb: Hevemiddel: Bakepulver; Natron; Selvhevende mel; Surdeigsstarter; Usyret; Gjær; Annet
zh-TW: 膨鬆劑: 泡打粉; 小蘇打粉; 自發粉; 酸種酵母; 無發酵; 酵母; 其他
ja: 膨張剤: ベーキングパウダー; 重曹; セルフライジングフラワー; サワードウスターター; 無発酵; 酵母; その他
ko: 팽창제: 베이킹 파우더; 베이킹 소다; 셀프 라이징 플라워; 사워도우 스타터; 무발효; 효모; 기타
de: Triebmittel: Backpulver; Natron; Selbsttreibendes Mehl; Sauerteig-Starter; Ungesäuert; Hefe; Sonstige
th: สารช่วยให้ขึ้นฟู: ผงฟู; เบกกิ้งโซดา; แป้งสาลีเอนกประสงค์ชนิดขึ้นฟู; ยีสต์ธรรมชาติ (Sourdough starter); ไม่ใส่สารทำให้ฟู; ยีสต์; อื่นๆ
bg-BG: Набухвател: Бакпулвер; Сода за хляб; Самобухващо брашно; Квас; Без набухвател; Мая; Друг
vi: Chất làm nở: Bột nở; Muối nở; Bột mì đa dụng; Men tự nhiên; Không men; Men nở; Khác
lt-LT: Rauginimo medžiaga: Kepimo milteliai; Geriamoji soda; Savaime iškylantys miltai; Raugas; Neraudintas; Mielės; Kita
sv: Jäsmedel: Bakpulver; Bikarbonat; Självjästande mjöl; Surdegsgrund; Ojäst; Jäst; Övrigt
hr-HR: Sredstvo za dizanje tijesta: Prašak za pecivo; Soda bikarbona; Brašno s praškom za pecivo; Kiselo tijesto (starter); Beskvasno; Kvasac; Ostalo
el: Διογκωτικό μέσο: Μπέικιν πάουντερ; Μαγειρική σόδα; Αλεύρι που φουσκώνει μόνο του; Προζύμι; Άζυμο; Μαγιά; Άλλο
en: Leavening agent: Baking powder; Baking soda; Self-rising flour; Sourdough starter; Unleavened; Yeast; Other
ro-RO: Agent de dospire: Praf de copt; Bicarbonat de sodiu; Făină cu agent de creștere; Maia; Fără agent de creștere; Drojdie; Altele
it: Agente lievitante: Lievito in polvere; Bicarbonato di sodio; Farina autolievitante; Lievito madre; Non lievitato; Lievito; Altro